Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-605
Arrests or summons; hearing; failure to appear; violation; penalty.

It shall be the duty of any conservation officer to make arrests or issue a summons, or both, or otherwise notify any resident of this state to appear at a place specified in such summons or notice and at a time likewise specified at least five days after such arrest unless the person arrested shall demand an earlier hearing or, if such person so desires, at an immediate hearing or a hearing within twenty-four hours thereafter at a convenient hour before a magistrate within the township or county wherein such offense was committed. Any resident refusing to give written promise to appear or any nonresident refusing to give a guaranteed arrest bond or similar written instrument shall be taken immediately by such officer before the nearest or most accessible magistrate. Any person who willfully violates his or her written promise to appear shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor regardless of the disposition of the charge upon which he or she was originally arrested.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 295.

A search warrant would obviously not be required to authorize service on plaintiff's lake property of writs and process. Kuester v. State, 191 Neb. 680, 217 N.W.2d 180 (1974).